California, session 20252026, AB1735.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation that would authorize the City of Cathedral City to remove from public recreational use, and use as a fire station, a portion of park property in the city acquired or improved with grant moneys from the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code) and the Nejedly-Hart State, Urban, and Coastal Park Bond Act of 1976 (Chapter 1.68 (commencing with Section 5096.111) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code), subject to the acquisition of replacement park property of equal or greater recreational value approved by the Department of Parks and Recreation, to be used for park purposes, and at no cost to the state.